Utah, session 2026, HB588.
Section 1. Section 26B-1-231 is amended to read:26B-1-231. Office of American Indian-Alaska Native Health and Family Services -- Creation -- Director -- Purpose -- Duties.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Director" means the director of the office appointed under Subsection (3).(b)"Missing or murdered indigenous individual" means an individual of tribal origin who has gone missing or is murdered.(b)(c)"Office" means the Office of American Indian-Alaska Native Health and Family Services created in Subsection (2).(d)"Peace officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-1-102.(2)There is created within the department the Office of American Indian-Alaska Native Health and Family Services.(3)The executive director shall appoint a director of the office who:(a)has a bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college;(b)is experienced in administration; and(c)is knowledgeable about the areas of American Indian-Alaska Native practices.(4)(a)The director is the administrative head of the office and shall serve under the supervision of the executive director.(b)The executive director may hire staff as necessary to carry out the duties of the office described in Subsection (5)(b).(5)(a)The purpose of the office is to oversee and coordinate department services for Utah's American Indian-Alaska Native populations.(b)The office shall:(i)oversee and coordinate department services for Utah's American Indian-Alaska Native populations;(ii)conduct regular and meaningful consultation with Indian tribes when there is a proposed department action that has an impact on an Indian tribe as a sovereign entity;(iii)monitor agreements between the department and Utah's American Indian-Alaska Native populations; and(iv)oversee the health liaison appointed under Section 26B-1-232 and ICWA liaison appointed under Section 26B-1-233.;(v)create a training curriculum designed for a peace officer conducting an investigation of a missing or murdered indigenous individual that covers:(A)methods that a peace officer may use to gather accurate and complete information relating to the race, ethnicity, and tribal affiliation of a missing or murdered indigenous individual;(B)principles of tribal sovereignty and how the principles relate to an investigation into the disappearance or murder of a missing or murdered indigenous individual;(C)federal, state, and tribal laws that relate to an investigation into the disappearance or murder of a missing or murdered indigenous individual;(D)methods of coordination with family members of a missing or murdered indigenous individual during the investigation into the disappearance or murder of the missing or murdered indigenous individual; and(E)best practices for interviewing family members of a missing or murdered indigenous individual during the investigation into the disappearance or murder of the missing or murdered indigenous individual; and(vi)at least once every three years, review and update the curriculum described in Subsection (5)(b)(v).(c)The office may coordinate with universities, non-profit organizations, and any other person with subject-matter expertise relating to the curriculum described in Subsection (5)(b)(v) to develop the curriculum described in Subsection (5)(b)(v).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.